West Virginia, session 2026, HB4258.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. Authorization for Department of revenue to promulgate legislative rules. §64-7-1. Tax Department. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §47-21A-23 of this code, modified by the Tax Department to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Tax Department (on-line bingo and raffles, 110 CSR 16A), is authorized.